Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB732.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6108 of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6108. Relief.* * *(e.1) Shared telephone plans.--(1) If a plaintiff is a party to a telephone plan contract held by and in the name of the defendant, or a relative of the defendant, in a protection order or consent agreement approved by the court in accordance with subsection (a), the court shall:(i) Order the defendant to remove the plaintiff as a party to the telephone plan contract within three 123456789101112131415161718 calendar days.(ii) Order the defendant to pay a surcharge, early termination fee or other penalty that may be incurred as a result of removing the plaintiff as a party to the telephone plan contract.(2) Failure to remove the plaintiff as a party to the shared telephone contract shall be subject to the penalties as prescribed in sections 6113 (relating to arrest for violation of order) and 6114 (relating to contempt for violation of order or agreement).(3) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Shared telephone plan." A package of services offered to subscribers at a set monthly access fee or rate by a telecommunications service provider, including, but not limited to, voice, messaging, data, Internet access and television content under a telephone plan contract."Telecommunications service provider." A company, including a provider of cable television, that supplies customers with telecommunications services, including land line and wireless telephone services, Internet access, data and the delivery of television content."Telephone plan contract." A shared telephone plan that allows a customer to share minutes and other services with another individual under one account or as parties to one contract with a telecommunications service provider, regardless of whether the plan is a shared-minute plan or family plan.* * *20250HB0732PN0756 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. Title 23 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6108.8. Shared telephone plans.(a) Opt out.--(1) A telecommunications service provider shall allow an individual who is a party to a telephone plan contract with the provider and a victim of domestic violence involving another individual who is a party to the same telephone plan contract to opt out of the telephone plan contract without charge. A request to opt out of a telephone plan contract must be in writing and include one of the following documents which must relate to the domestic violence:(i) A valid police report.(ii) A valid protection from abuse order.(iii) A signed affidavit from a licensed medical or mental health care provider, an employee of a court acting within the scope of employment, a social worker, a rape crisis counselor, a domestic violence counselor or an advocate acting on behalf of an agency that assists domestic violence victims.(2) A request to opt out of a telephone plan contract shall be made in good faith and the telecommunications service provider shall waive the otherwise applicable fees or charges for the individual making the request.(3) If an individual requests an accommodation under this section, the telecommunications service provider shall provide, at no additional charge to the individual, a new telephone number within 24 hours from the time the request is made.(b) Deadline for providing documents.--A document provided to a telecommunications service provider by an individual 20250HB0732PN0756 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 seeking to opt out of a telephone plan contract in accordance with subsection (a) must be:(1) submitted to the telecommunications service provider at the time the request to opt out is made; and(2) issued no more than six months before the opt-out request.(c) Retention and confidentiality of documents.--(1) A telecommunications service provider that receives a written request accompanied by the necessary documentation to opt out of a telephone plan contract in accordance with this section may retain the documentation or return it to the individual seeking to opt out.(2) Documentation provided to a telecommunications service provider by a victim of domestic violence shall be considered confidential communications and, if retained by the telecommunications service provider, shall be subject to the confidentiality requirements under Federal or State law.(d) Applicability.--This section shall apply to telephone plan contracts entered into on or after the effective date of this section.(e) Definitions.--For the purposes of this section, the terms "telecommunications service provider" and "telephone plan contract" shall have the meanings given to them in section 6108(e.1)(3) (relating to relief).Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The addition of 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108(e.1) shall take effect immediately.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0732PN0756 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930